Vermont, session 2025-2026, H16.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REPEAL
30 V.S.A. chapter 94 is repealed.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 3102 is amended to read:
§ 3102. CONFIDENTIALITY OF TAX RECORDS
* * *
(e) The Commissioner may, in the Commissioner’s discretion and subject
to such conditions and requirements as the Commissioner may provide,
including any confidentiality requirements of the Internal Revenue Service,
disclose a return or return information:
* * *
VT LEG #379208 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.16
2025 Page 3 of 3
(23) To the Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public
Service, provided the disclosure relates to the fuel tax under 33 V.S.A. chapter
25 and is used for the purposes of auditing compliance with the Clean Heat
Standard under 30 V.S.A. chapter 94. The Commissioner shall, at a minimum,
provide the names of any new businesses selling heating fuel in any given year
and the names of any businesses that are no longer selling heating fuel.
[Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 3. ABOLISHMENT OF CLEAN HEAT STANDARD POSITIONS
For fiscal year 2025, as of January 1, 2026, the positions created in 2023
Acts and Resolves No. 18, Sec. 7(a) (Public Utility Commission) and (c)
(Department of Public Service) that support the Clean Heat Standard program
are eliminated.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379208 v.1